Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FRENCH LAKE WATER-QUALITY IMPROVEMENT.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to Rice County to address water-quality concerns at French Lake. Rice County may use this grant to contract for water-quality improvement services, testing, necessary infrastructure, training, and maintenance. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION EXTENSION; FRENCH LAKE WATER-QUALITY IMPROVEMENT GRANT.new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to Rice County to address water-quality concerns at French Lake under Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (m), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end